Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2939
Participation in mediation.

An attorney may represent, or other individual designated by a party may accompany the party to, and participate in a mediation. A waiver of representation or participation given before the mediation may be rescinded.

Laws 2003, LB 255, § 10.